Wyoming, session 2025, HB0331.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-3-306(a) is amended to read:

23-3-306. Use of aircraft, automobiles, motorized and
snow vehicles and artificial light for hunting or fishing
prohibited; exceptions; penalties.

HB0331

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0753
(a) The following shall apply to the taking of
wildlife:

(i) When on a person's private land, no person
shall harass, pursue, hunt, shoot, or kill any Wyoming
wildlife except predatory animals with, from, or by use of
any aircraft, automotive vehicle, trailer, motor-propelled
wheeled vehicle, or vehicle designed for travel over snow;.

(ii) When on public land, no person shall:

(A) Pursue, hunt, shoot or kill any Wyoming
wildlife except predatory animals from or by use of any
aircraft, automotive vehicle, trailer, motor-propelled
wheeled vehicle or vehicle designed for travel over snow;

(B) Harass, injure or kill any Wyoming
wildlife or predatory animals with an automotive vehicle,
trailer, motor-propelled wheeled vehicle or vehicle
designed for travel over snow.

(iii) No person shall use any aircraft, to aid
in the taking of any Wyoming wildlife, except predatory
HB0331

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0753
animals, whether by spotting or locating the wildlife,
communicating with any person attempting to take the
wildlife, or by providing other aid to any person taking
the wildlife;.

(iv) Nothing in this subsection shall apply to
the use of any aircraft by governmental agencies, their
employees, contractors or designees performing any lawful
duties;.

(v) The commission may exempt handicapped
hunters from any provision of this subsection;.

(vi) For purposes of this section "aircraft"
means any machine or device capable of atmospheric flight
including but not limited to an airplane, helicopter,
glider, dirigible or unmanned aerial vehicle.

Section 2. The game and fish commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0331

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0753
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.

(b) Sections 2 and 3 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0331